North Dakota, session 69, HB1021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated from special funds derived from the workforce safety and insurance
fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, to workforce safety and insurance, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Workforce safety and insurance $65,954,976 $11,290,155 $77,245,131
operations
New and vacant FTE pool 0 3,189,008 3,189,008
Total special funds $65,954,976 $14,479,163 $80,434,139
Full-time equivalent positions 260.14 0.00 260.14
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description Other Funds
Claims and policy system replacement project $5,208,325
MyWSI extranet enhancement project 1,366,050
Building improvements 2,000,000
Total $8,574,375
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. Workforce
safety and insurance may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to workforce safety and insurance operations line item in
accordance with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved
by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1021 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1021.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 0 Absent 8
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State